src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"Gemination 0:s"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
0:s <=>   Cns:* Vow:+         :s _   :i          (%^AO:0) %> [:i - i3:] (%> [n|t %^A:]) # ; 
          Cns:* Vow:+         :s _ [e:|i:]                %> i2:i %> %^V:i ;  ! klas0i>i2>in:klass0>i>in ja vuossiin
          Cns:* Vow  [n|l|r] t:s _   :i                   %> [:i - i3:] (i2:i) ;  ! to be fixed. Seems to not do anything?
                             t:s _  e:0  %^Por:0  %^E2I:0 %> i2: %> %^V: ; ! ! hirssii(n), uussiin uussii in Por
                             t:s _  e:i (%^Por:0) %^E2I:0 %> i5: ; ! ONLY SUPERL, i5 IS SUPERLATIVE i
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ a: (%^Por:0) [%> :a|(%^A2I:0) (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! Only in Por, 0:k kk
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ ä: (Dial:) [%> :ä|%> i2: %> :i (%> n) ] ; !nysä>nyssii ja nyssiin 
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ ö %> :ö ;
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ y: [%> :y|%> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ]    ;
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ u: [%> %^V:u|%> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #]  ;
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ :o [ %> :o | %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ;
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ [:o|u|ä:]       %> i5: (:i)  %> [m|n]  ; ! superlatiivi 
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ %> :e (Dial:) :e ; ! pestä:pessee
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ s _ :Vow (Dial:)       %>  i7: ; ! cond. kasuta-kassuis
          [.#.|#:] Vow:* Vow:+ s _ :Vow (Dial:)       %>  i7: ; ! cond. kiusata-kiussais
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :Vow %>  i7: ; ! cond. kuorsata-kuorssais
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :i         [ %> %^V:i| (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
          [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow   s _ i [%> :i| (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! pessiit
                     [l|r|n|m] :s _ e: %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V: ;
                     [l|r|n|m] s _  i         %> i2: %> t %^A: ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :ö %> :ö ;
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :y [%> :y| %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :u [%> :u| %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :o %> :o ;
                     [l|r|n|m] s _ :e %> :e ;
[.#.|#:] Cns:+ Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] s _ :a %> :a ;
[.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [r|n]   s _ a: %^Por:0 %> :a                              ; ! kanssaa, suorssaa
[.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [r|n]   s _ a: %^Por:0 [%^AO:0 | %^A2I:0] %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ; ! kanssoi, suorssii
[.#.|#:] Cns:+ Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] s _ ä: [%> :ä| %> [i2:|i5:] (%>) :i (%> [m|n]) ] ; ! superlatiivi tylsä/tylssiin, sg.par, pl.par/gen
                         i t: k: _ ä: %> i5:i :i                                ; ! superlatiivi pitkä/pissiin



"Gemination 0:t"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
0:t <=>                    :Vow :t _ [:o|:i]  (%^AO:0) %>  [:i - i2: - i3:] ; ! kađota:kato -> kattoisin (mutta kaattaat+sg3 = kaatoi eikä kaattoi)
                           :Vow :t _ [Vow: - e:] %> i2:i %> :i ; ! värriin, vattiin mut EI vuottiin!!
                           :Vow :t _ e:            %> i7:i Cns ; ! contr verbs
                           :Vow :t _ ä: %> i5: :i %> [m|n]     ; ! superl. mättiin
                           :Vow :t _ :i  %^AO:0 %>  i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ; ! mon. äittii, äittiin
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ a: (%^Por:0) [%> :a| %^AO: %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ; ! Only in Por, 0:k kk
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           [t|t2:] _ a: %^Por:0 [%> :a | %^A2I: %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:+ Vow:+           :t _ i %^AO:0 %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ; ! fati - fattii (monikko)
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ ä %> :ä ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ ö %> [:ö|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ y %> [:y|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ u %> [%^V:u|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ [:o|u] %> i5: %> [m|n]   ; ! superlatiivi 
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ :o %> [:o|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ; ! sata:sattoi, maito:maittoi
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           :t _ e (Dial:) %> :e ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:+ Vow:+            t _ a %> %^V: (t) # ; ! inf: hoittaat, juttaat + prt.sg3 hoittaa, juttaa.
 [.#.|#:] [Cns:* Vow:+] ([Cns:* Vow:+]) [l|r|n|m] :t _ :a (Dial:) %> :a  ; ! sg
 [.#.|#:] [Cns:* Vow:+] ([Cns:* Vow:+]) [l|r|n|m] :t _ a: (Dial:) [ %^A2I: | %^AO: ] %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #  ; ! pl
 [.#.|#:] [Cns:* Vow:+] ([Cns:* Vow:+]) [l|r|n|m] :t _ :ä %> :ä  ; ! sg
 [.#.|#:] [Cns: *Vow:+] ([Cns:* Vow:+]) [l|r|n|m] :t _ ä: (%^A0:) %> i2: (%>) :i (%> t %^A:)  ; ! pl                                           
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :ö %> [:ö|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :y %> [:y|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
                Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ :t _ :y %> [:y|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! näyttäyttyyt
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
                Vow:+ Cns:+ Vow:+ :t _ :u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! soppeuttuut
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :u %>     i5:  %> [m|n] ;
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :o %> [:o|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! kunto:kunttoi, kunttoin
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :Vow %>  i7: ;
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ i [ %> %^V:i| (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _  i         %> i2: %> t %^A: ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ :e %> :e ;
                        [l|r|n|m] :t _ e: %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V: ;

"Gemination 0:v"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
0:v <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ ä %> :ä ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ ö %> :ö ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ i (Dial:) [%> :i| (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #]  ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ y [%> :y| %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) #] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ :o (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) (%> Clt:+) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ :o (Dial:)            %^AO:0  %> i5: %> [m|n]   ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ e (Dial:) %> :e ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ :a (Dial:0) %> :a ; ! for kuvvaa Dialects could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ (e:) (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i %> :i ; ! kivvii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i       ; ! kuva kuvvii ! used2be just (Dummy:0) after a:i
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _  ä:  (Dial:) %> :i %> :i           ; ! jyvä jyvviin, jyvvii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _  ä:  (Dial:) %>  i5:  :i %> [m|n]  ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow v _ :Vow (Dial:)       %>  i7: ; ! cond. kuvata-kuvvais
       ! [.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] v _ :ä %> :ä  ; ! kanskje enta et par Cns Vow. Må ikke gi lämpim^A>mp^A>^A -> lämpimä>mpä>ä
        ![.#.|#:] Cns:*  Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] v _ :a %> :a ;
                             ! [l|r|n|m] v _ :Vow %>  i7: ;
                             ! [l|r|n|m] v _ :i       %>          %^V:i ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
                             ! [l|r|n|m] :v _ e: %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V: ;
                             ! [l|r|n|m] v _  i         %> i2: %> t %^A: ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                              ![l|r|n|m] v _ :ö %> :ö ;
                              ![l|r|n|m] v _ :y %> :y ;
                              ![l|r|n|m] v _ :u %> :u ;
                              ![l|r|n|m] v _ :o %> :o ;
                              ![l|r|n|m] v _ :e %> :e ;
















!! ## Gradation rules
!    ===================



!! ### Rules for *p* gradation 

"Gradation p:0 (pp:p)"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
p:0 <=> Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) p _ (:h) (Dummy:) Vow: (Vow:0) (Dummy:) (:i) (l|r|n) (e:0) (Dial:0) %^WG: ; !tytärtä   !entinen omppu
        Vow: ([l|m|n|r]) p _  :o %^WG: %^AO: %> i2:i   %> [ n|t ]  [e|:a|:ä] ;

"Gradation p:v"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
p:v <=> Vow: _ Vow:      Dummy:* ([:i|e:0]) Dummy:* %^WG:0 ; ! papu:pavun
        Vow: _ Vow: Cns: Dummy:* (e:0)      Dummy:* %^WG:0 ; ! taipal:taival
       [r|l] _ [e:|a:|ä:|o|y|u] (Dial:) %^WG:0 ; ! kylpy:kylvyn

"Gradation mp:mm"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
p:m <=> Vow: m _  Vow: (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0 ;

!! **Tests:**
!!€ kilpe^WG>n
!!€ kilve0>n
!!€ ranka^WG>n
!!€ ranga0>n
!!€ napa^WG>n
!!€ nava0>n
!!€ taipal^WG
!!€ taival0
!!€ varpa^WG
!!€ varva0
!!€ halpa^WG
!!€ halva0
!!€ turpe^WGt
!!€ turve0t

!! ### Rules for *k* gradation 

"Gradation i6:0, in word poika: pojan"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
i6:0 <=> _ k: Vow: (Dial:0) %^WG:0 (%^AO:0) ;

!! **Tests:**
!!€ poi6ka^WG>n
!!€ po0ja0>n
!!€ poi6ka^WG^A0>i2>le
!!€ po0j000>i>le

!! TODO: When k:j and when k:0 between e and i.

"Gradation k:j"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
k:j <=> [a|ä|æ|e|i|i6:] _ [e:|i:]     (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! mäki  - mäjen
 [.#.|#:]     Cns     u _ e:          (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! tuki - tujen
                      i _ [ö:|o:]     (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; !
                    i6: _ [e:|i|ä|a:] (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! poika poha, pojitte
                  [e|i] _ [e:|i|ä:|a:|u]  %^Por:             %^WG:0 (%> i2:i) ; ! aika-aijan (Dummy: before ^WG? !TODO DONE move to k:0 in Var
             \[e] [r|l] _  e:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0    ; ! jälki:jäljen, sylki:syljen
            [a|e] [r|l] _  e:         (Dummy:)               %^WG:0 %> ; ! haljeta, halkee, seljetä, selkee
                   j a  _  e: l        (Dummy:)               %^WG:0 %> ; ! jajela, jakelee
                y [l|r] _  ä:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; ! ylkä:yljän, yrkä:yrjän
                y [l|r] _  y:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0      ; ! hylky-hyljyn
        [a|e|i|o|y|ä|ö] _  e  n  e:0  %^Por:                 %^WG:0 %^E0:0 ; !ikene- - ijen
 [.#.|#:]   Cns [o|u] l _  i   %^Por: %^WG:0                           ; ! polki-poljin
 [.#.|#:]   Cns   a a   _  a: (%^Por:) %^WG:0 (%^AE:0)                  ; ! raaka-raajan
 [.#.|#:]   Cns     ä   _  ä: (%^Por:) %^WG:0 (%^AE:0)                  ; ! räkä-räjät
 [.#.|#:]     Cns [o|u] _  e:         %^WG:0                           ; ! lukkeet  - lujen
 [.#.|#:]         j a   _  a:     %^WG:0 ([%^AO:|%^AE:]) (%>) (i3:) (%>)  ; ! jakkaat:jajan
 [.#.|#:]       k i i   _  a:     %^WG:0 ([%^AO:|%^AE:]) (%>) (i3:) (%>)  ; ! kiikkaat:kiijan
 [.#.|#:]     Cns Vow i _  u      %^WG:0 ([%^AO:|%^AE:]) (%>) (i3:) (%>)  ; ! kaikkuut:kaijun
                      h _  e:         (Dummy:) (:i) (Dummy:) %^WG:0       ; ! vehke- - vehjet, lohke- lohjeta, puhke- puhjeta
